New Jersey, session 221, A3634.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, special nutrition programs means the WIC Farmers Market Nutrition Program established by the federal WIC Farmers Market Nutrition Act of 1992, Pub. L. 102-314 (42 U.S.C. s.1771 et al.), the Seniors Farmers Market Nutrition Program established by 7 U.S.C. s.3007, and the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children established by 42 U.S.C. s.1786. b.    Pursuant to section 3 of the federal WIC Farmers Market Nutrition Act of 1992, Pub. L. 102-314 (42 U.S.C. s.1771 et al.), and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the Governor shall designate the Department of Agriculture as the appropriate State agency to administer the WIC Farmers Market Nutrition Program. c.     Pursuant to 7 U.S.C. s.3007, and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the Governor shall designate the Department of Agriculture as the appropriate State agency to administer the Seniors Farmers Market Nutrition Program. d.    Pursuant to the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, 42 U.S.C. s.1786, and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the Department of Agriculture shall be the designated State agency to administer the program. e.     Any employees of the Department of Health responsible for administering the special nutrition programs prior to the enactment of this act who the Secretary of Agriculture deems to be necessary for the proper administration of the special nutrition programs are transferred to the Department of Agriculture. f.     The transfers directed by this act shall be made in accordance with the "State Agency Transfer Act," P.L.1971, c. 375 (C.52:14D-1 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.